hunspell/new_xal.affix
FLAG long
SFX Ax   0 уларн у
SFX Ax   0 улам у
SFX Ax   0 уламдн у
SFX Ax   0 улачн у
SFX Ax   0 улатн у
SFX Ax   0 улань у
SFX Ax   0 уһас у
SFX Ax   0 уһасн у
SFX Ax   0 уһасм у
SFX Ax   0 уһасмдн у
SFX Ax   0 уһасчн у
SFX Ax   0 уһастн у
SFX Ax   0 уһаснь у
SFX Ax   0 уһур у
SFX Ax   0 уһурн у
SFX Ax   0 уһурм у
SFX Ax   0 уһурмдн у
SFX Ax   0 уһурчн у
SFX Ax   0 уһуртн у
SFX Ax   0 уһурнь у
SFX Ax   0 үһин ү
SFX Ax   0 үһиннь ү
SFX Ax   0 үһинм ү
SFX Ax   0 үһинмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһинчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһинтн ү
SFX Ax   0 үтә ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәһән ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәм ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәтн ү
SFX Ax   0 үтәнь ү
SFX Ax   0 үд ү
SFX Ax   0 үдән ү
SFX Ax   0 үдм ү
SFX Ax   0 үдмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үдчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үдтн ү
SFX Ax   0 үднь ү
SFX Ax   0 үг ү
SFX Ax   0 үһән ү
SFX Ax   0 үһим ү
SFX Ax   0 үһимдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһичн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһитн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһинь ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәр ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәрн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәрм ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәрмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәрчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәртн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәрнь ү
SFX Ax   0 үлә ү
SFX Ax   0 үләрн ү
SFX Ax   0 үләм ү
SFX Ax   0 үләмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үләчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үләтн ү
SFX Ax   0 үләнь ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәс ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәсн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәсм ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәсмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәсчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәстн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһәснь ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүр ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүрн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүрм ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүрмдн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүрчн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүртн ү
SFX Ax   0 үһүрнь ү



SFX Bd Y 50
# + Дательный
SFX Bd   0 ад	н
SFX Bd   0 ынд	[лндт]
SFX Bd   0 инд	[рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинд	ң
SFX Bd   0 нд	[иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинд	[у]
SFX Bd   0 тад	[^н]
SFX Bd   н тад	н
# + Винительный
SFX Bd   0 аг	 н
SFX Bd   0 ыниг	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 иниг	 [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гиниг ң
SFX Bd   0 ниг	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һиниг [у]
SFX Bd   0 таг	 [^н]
SFX Bd   н таг	 н
# + Творительный
SFX Bd   0 аһар	 н
SFX Bd   0 ынәр	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 инәр	 [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинәр ң
SFX Bd   0 нар	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинәр [у]
SFX Bd   0 таһар [^н]
SFX Bd   н таһар н
# + Совместный
SFX Bd   0 ата	 н
SFX Bd   0 ынта	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 интә  [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинтә ң
SFX Bd   0 нта	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинтә [у]
SFX Bd   0 тата	 [^н]
SFX Bd   н тата	 н
# + Соединительный
SFX Bd   0 ала	 н
SFX Bd   0 ынла	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 инлә	 [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинлә ң
SFX Bd   0 нла	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинлә [у]
SFX Bd   0 тала	 [^н]
SFX Bd   н тала	 н
# + Исходный
SFX Bd   0 аһас	 н
SFX Bd   0 ынәс	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 инәс	 [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинәс ң
SFX Bd   0 нас	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинәс [у]
SFX Bd   0 таһас [^н]
SFX Bd   н таһас н
# + Направительный
SFX Bd   0 аһур	 н
SFX Bd   0 ынүр	 [лндт]
SFX Bd   0 инүр	 [рвспкмшзбгхчщжцчфһҗ]
SFX Bd   0 гинүр ң
SFX Bd   0 нур	 [иаоеыяюэәө]
SFX Bd   0 һинүр [у]
SFX Bd   0 таһур [^н]
SFX Bd   н таһур н


SFX Bm Y 110
# + Дательный
SFX Bm   0 әд	 н
SFX Bm   0 инд   [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинд  ң
SFX Bm   0 һинд	 [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәд	 [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәд	 н
# + Винительный
SFX Bm   0 әг	 н
SFX Bm   0 иниг  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гиниг ң
SFX Bm   0 һиниг [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәг	 [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәг	 н
# + Творительный
SFX Bm   0 әһәр	 н
SFX Bm   0 инәр  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинәр ң
SFX Bm   0 һинәр [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәһәр [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәһәр н
# + Совместный
SFX Bm   0 әтә	 н
SFX Bm   0 интә  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинтә ң
SFX Bm   0 һинтә [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәтә	 [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәтә	 н
# + Соединительный
SFX Bm   0 әлә	 н
SFX Bm   0 инлә  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинлә ң
SFX Bm   0 һинлә [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәлә	 [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәлә	 н
# + Исходный
SFX Bm   0 әһәс	 н
SFX Bm   0 инәс  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинәс ң
SFX Bm   0 һинәс [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәһәс [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәһәс н
# + Направительный
SFX Bm   0 әһүр	 н
SFX Bm   0 инүр  [трвслпкмдшзбгхчщжцчфһҗн]
SFX Bm   0 гинүр ң
SFX Bm   0 һинүр [ү]
SFX Bm   0 тәһүр [^н]
SFX Bm   н тәһүр н


SFX Bx Y 120
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 aһинд	а
SFX Bx   0 aһиниг	а
SFX Bx   0 aһинәр	а
SFX Bx   0 aһинлә	а
SFX Bx   0 aһинтә	а
SFX Bx   0 aһинәс	а
SFX Bx   0 aһинүр	а
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 әһинд	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһиниг	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһинәр	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһинлә	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһинтә	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһинәс	ә
SFX Bx   0 әһинүр	ә
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 оһинд	о
SFX Bx   0 оһиниг	о
SFX Bx   0 оһинәр	о
SFX Bx   0 оһинлә	о
SFX Bx   0 оһинәс	о
SFX Bx   0 оһинтә	о
SFX Bx   0 оһинүр	о
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 өһинд	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһиниг	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһинәр	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһинлә	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһинтә	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһинәс	ө
SFX Bx   0 өһинүр	ө
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 еһинд	е
SFX Bx   0 еһиниг	е
SFX Bx   0 еһинтә	е
SFX Bx   0 еһинлә	е
SFX Bx   0 еһинәс	е
SFX Bx   0 еһинүр	е
SFX Bx   0 еһинәр	е
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 иһинд	и
SFX Bx   0 иһиниг	и
SFX Bx   0 иһинтә	и
SFX Bx   0 иһинлә	и
SFX Bx   0 иһинәс	и
SFX Bx   0 иһинүр	и
SFX Bx   0 иһинәр	и
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 яһинд	я
SFX Bx   0 яһиниг	я
SFX Bx   0 яһинәс	я
SFX Bx   0 яһинүр	я
SFX Bx   0 яһинлә	я
SFX Bx   0 яһинтә	я
SFX Bx   0 яһинәр	я
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 уһинд	у
SFX Bx   0 уһинтә	у
SFX Bx   0 уһинлә	у
SFX Bx   0 уһинәс	у
SFX Bx   0 уһинүр	у
SFX Bx   0 уһинәр	у
SFX Bx   0 уһиниг	у
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 үһинд	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһинәс	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһинтә	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһинлә	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһиниг	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһинүр	ү
SFX Bx   0 үһинәр	ү
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 атад		а
SFX Bx   0 атаг		а
SFX Bx   0 атаһар	а
SFX Bx   0 атала	а
SFX Bx   0 атата	а
SFX Bx   0 атаһас	а
SFX Bx   0 атаһур	а
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 әтәд		ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәг		ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәһәс	ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәһүр	ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәһәр	ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәтә	ә
SFX Bx   0 әтәлә	ә
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 отад		о
SFX Bx   0 отаг		о
SFX Bx   0 отала	о
SFX Bx   0 отата	о
SFX Bx   0 отаһар	о
SFX Bx   0 отаһур	о
SFX Bx   0 отаһас	о
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 өтәд		ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәг		ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәтә	ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәлә	ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәһәс	ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәһүр	ө
SFX Bx   0 өтәһәр	ө
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 етәд		е
SFX Bx   0 етәг		е
SFX Bx   0 етәһәс	е
SFX Bx   0 етәһүр	е
SFX Bx   0 етәһәр	е
SFX Bx   0 етәлә	е
SFX Bx   0 етәтә	е
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 ятәд		я
SFX Bx   0 ятәг		я
SFX Bx   0 ятәтә	я
SFX Bx   0 ятәлә	я
SFX Bx   0 ятәһәс	я
SFX Bx   0 ятәһүр	я
SFX Bx   0 ятәһәр	я
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 утад		у
SFX Bx   0 утаг		у
SFX Bx   0 утаһас	у
SFX Bx   0 утаһар	у
SFX Bx   0 утаһур	у
SFX Bx   0 утата	у
SFX Bx   0 утала	у
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 үтәд		ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәг		ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәтә	ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәлә	ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәһәс	ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәһүр	ү
SFX Bx   0 үтәһәр	ү
# -----------------------
SFX Bx   0 итәд		и
SFX Bx   0 итәг		и
SFX Bx   0 итәтә	и
SFX Bx   0 итәлә	и
SFX Bx   0 итәһәс	и
SFX Bx   0 итәһүр	и
SFX Bx   0 итәһәр	и


# СПРЯЖЕНИЕ ВРЕМЕННЫХ ФОРМ ГЛАГОЛОВ ПО ЛИЦАМ
