hunspell/new_xal.dic
хотн/AdBd	[SUB]
ишкә/AmBm   [SUB]
унтраһач/AdBd
урвач/AdBd
урлдач/AdBd
урхч/AdBd
устглач/AdBd
уурхач/AdBd
ухалгч/AdBd
шаарлач/AdBd
хавцлач/AdBd
хаагч/AdBd
хадасч/AdBd
хадһлач/AdBd
хайглач/AdBd
халач/AdBd
халулгч/AdBd
халуч/AdBd
халцхалгч/AdBd
ханцвч/AdBd
хаһач/AdBd
харвач/AdBd
харһнач/AdBd
харсгч/AdBd
харч/AdBd
харшлгч/AdBd
хасгч/AdBd
хатрлч/AdBd
хатхач/AdBd
хойрдгч/AdBd
холвач/AdBd
холвулгч/AdBd
холч/AdBd
хоңшавч/AdBd
хоосрулгч/AdBd
шаглач/AdBd
хошлач/AdBd
хувагдгч/AdBd
худлч/AdBd
хулхач/AdBd
хурагч/AdBd
шалдач/AdBd
шалһгч/AdBd
хутхач/AdBd
хуурч/AdBd
цалмч/AdBd
цуглулач/AdBd
цутхач/AdBd
чавчач/AdBd
чаһрч/AdBd
яллгч/AdBd
ялч/AdBd
ясач/AdBd
